Nebraska, session 109, LB1127A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $4,750 from the State Park
Cash Revolving Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $4,750 from the State Park Cash
Revolving Fund for FY2027-28 to the Game and Parks Commission, for Program 549,
to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 1127, One Hundred
Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-